Utah statutes.
26-39-401.   Licensure requirements -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 26-39-403, a person shall be licensed or certified in accordance with this chapter if the person:

(a)  provides or offers child care; or

(b)  provides care to qualifying children and requests to be licensed.

(2)  The department may issue licenses for a period not exceeding 24 months to child care providers who meet the requirements of:

(a)  this chapter; and

(b)  the department's rules governing child care programs.

(3)  A license issued under this chapter is not assignable or transferable.

